test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_oneform_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    lijkkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijkkuum
    tarkkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tarkkuum
    kiškuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiškuum
    kihluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kihluum
    kuátiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuátiluum
    ečiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ečiluum
    caimuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caimuum
    maŋanuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maŋanuum
    cuvnuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuvnuum
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skappuum
    skippuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skippuum
    erehtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: erehtuum
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kihtuum
    piähtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piähtuum
    kieptuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieptuum
    hirmástuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástuum
    hiämástuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiämástuum
    jiärástuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiärástuum
    najâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: najâstuum
    jamâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jamâstuum
    ostâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ostâstuum
    pivâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivâstuum
    paattuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paattuum
    pettuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pettuum
    asettuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asettuum
    šelgâsmittuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šelgâsmittuum
    njuottuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuottuum
    muottuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muottuum
    jávuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jávuttuum
    njuovâttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuovâttuum
    orvâttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orvâttuum
    livvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livvuum
    kuohčuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuohčuum
    smijđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smijđuum
    avžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avžuum
    livđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livđuum
    parttâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parttâšuum
    kuođđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuođđuum
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoččuum
    kuáivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáivum
    tuáivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuáivum
    káivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kááivum
    láivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lááivum
    ráivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rááivum
    siäivuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäivum
    tuálvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvum
    válvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váálvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvum
    hárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háárvum
    čárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čáárvum
    cuáhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuávum
    suáhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suávum
    suávvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suávum
    čuávvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuávum
    kááhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káávum
    lááppuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láávum
    láávvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láávum
    rááppuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráávum
    ciävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciävum
    kiävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiävum
    liävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liävum
    niävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niävum
    piähuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävum
    siähuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävum
    siävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävum
    čiävvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiävum
    niävzuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niävzum
    kiäzzuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäzum
    tiäbđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäbđum
    tiäbžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäbžum
    áiđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ááiđum
    páiđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pááiđum
    tuálššuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálšum
    riäpčuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäpčum
    kuárŋuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárŋum
    tuárššuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuáršum
    hárččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háárčum
    káržuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kááržum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    kuáttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáđum
    puáđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáđum
    čuážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuážum
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nááđum
    pážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páážum
    njiäššuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäšum
    tiälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláàm
    cicceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cicám
    kincceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kincám
    vyebdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuábdám
    niddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nidám
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tooidám
    käidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kááidám
    njeidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäidám
    meidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miäidám
    rijdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riijdám
    kildeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kildám
    sildeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sildám
    koldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koldám
    suldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suldám
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáldám
    čyeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáldám
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldám
    keldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldám
    kendiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiändám
    koddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kodám
    kirdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kirdám
    sirdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sirdám
    jurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurdám
    kurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kurdám
    murdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: murdám
    nurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdám
    kyerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárdám
    kuárdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárdám
    muárdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muárdám
    suárdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suárdám
    vyerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuárdám
    härdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háárdám
    pärdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páárdám
    rávhuttuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rávhuttudám
    tuvdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuvdám
    luávdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luávdám
    tevdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiävdám
    kyeddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuádám
    pallâkyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallâkuádám
    uáinistiškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáinistiškuádám
    meddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miädám
    teddiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiädám
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuálgám
    älgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áálgám
    loggeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: logám
    hurgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurgám
    šluvgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šluuvgám
    njävgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njáávgám
    peggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piägám
    spiđgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spiđgám
    pođgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pođgám
    snuđgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuđgám
    sikkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihám
    huikkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huuihám
    cilkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cilhám
    julkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julhám
    cuálkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuálhám
    kuálkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuálhám
    skuálkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuálhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    pelkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälhám
    cirkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirhám
    civkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciivhám
    livkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liivhám
    njivkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njivhám
    skuávkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuávhám
    vyetkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáđhám
    rätkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rááđhám
    toijeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tojám
    vävjiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váávjám
    ääijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ájám
    tuáijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájám
    lääččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láájám
    pääččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páájám
    eeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäjám
    huhkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huhkám
    juhkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juhkám
    šyehkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šuáhkám
    čulkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulkkám
    loskeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loskám
    käskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kááskám
    neskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niäskám
    ciŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciŋkám
    riškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riškám
    tiškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiškám
    šloŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloŋkám
    juškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juškám
    šilleeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šilám
    olleeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olám
    käälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kálám
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
    cäimiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cááimám
    jäämmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jámám
    uáiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáinám
    päiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pááinám
    lemniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liämnám
    suvneđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvnám
    läppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láápám
    cicceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cisám
    kocceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kosám
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsám
    mokseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moovsám
    vyeksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuávsám
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máávsám
    päksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páávsám
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsám
    kalmadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalmaditám
    älkkeedittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: älkkeeditám
    sajaidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajaiditám
    vajoidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajoiditám
    ciláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciláiditám
    skiláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiláiditám
    culáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: culáiditám
    sámáiditteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sámáiditám
    kiämáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiämáiditám
    pánáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pánáiditám
    škuráidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škuráiditám
    turáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turáiditám
    ruáváidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáváiditám
    skerčáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčáiditám
    čergijdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čergijditám
    movtijdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: movtijditám
    čagaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čagalditám
    sajaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajalditám
    čaŋaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaŋalditám
    vázáldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázálditám
    čuojâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuojâlditám
    čođâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čođâlditám
    mođárdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mođárditám
    viälgudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälguditám
    kiävhudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiävhuditám
    kuávšudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávšuditám
    nohádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noháditám
    čájádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáditám
    rátkádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rátkáditám
    suáládittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáláditám
    viäisádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viäisáditám
    mittádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mittáditám
    iärvádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iärváditám
    ledâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ledâgitám
    vahâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vahâgitám
    suollâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suollâgitám
    skerčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčâgitám
    povčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povčâgitám
    suvčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suvčâgitám
    parahittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parahitám
    tiškáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiškáhitám
    koškáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koškáhitám
    kovláhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kovláhitám
    škuráhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škuráhitám
    liäđáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liäđáhitám
    njulčâhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njulčâhitám
    iäláskittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäláskitám
    savŋelittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savŋelitám
    käpilittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käpilitám
    pehtilittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehtilitám
    huáppulittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huáppulitám
    kiäldálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldálitám
    iätkálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätkálitám
    ripálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ripálitám
    skuápálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuápálitám
    vázzálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzálitám
    jurgâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurgâlitám
    vierâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâlitám
    jurâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurâlitám
    skačâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skačâlitám
    kaččâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaččâlitám
    keččâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keččâlitám
    huššâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huššâlitám
    pastalmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastalmitám
    siskálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siskálmitám
    piävtálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävtálmitám
    jiäválmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiäválmitám
    jođálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođálmitám
    jieŋâlmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jieŋâlmitám
    čavdesmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavdesmitám
    mučismittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučismitám
    virkosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: virkosmitám
    rušmosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rušmosmitám
    nanosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nanosmitám
    nubásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nubásmitám
    kildásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kildásmitám
    váldásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váldásmitám
    kuávdásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávdásmitám
    njálgásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgásmitám
    šiälgásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiälgásmitám
    jiärmásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiärmásmitám
    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápásmitám
    kiäpásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäpásmitám
    puárásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puárásmitám
    visásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visásmitám
    vijsásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijsásmitám
    tiätásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiätásmitám
    jurbâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurbâsmitám
    čielgâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čielgâsmitám
    šelgâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šelgâsmitám
    ruokâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruokâsmitám
    nuorâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuorâsmitám
    ruotâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâsmitám
    tievâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tievâsmitám
    luovâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovâsmitám
    mučâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučâsmitám
    počâšmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: počâšmitám
    siävŋánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävŋánitám
    špuákkárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špuákkáritám
    pullárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pulláritám
    puljârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puljâritám
    patârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: patâritám
    kotârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kotâritám
    tuoldiistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoldiistitám
    nälistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nälistitám
    suáđistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáđistitám
    sajostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajostitám
    orostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostitám
    áimustittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áimustitám
    stálpástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stálpástitám
    topsástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: topsástitám
    tuálvástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvástitám
    tiŋgâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiŋgâstitám
    ruotâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâstitám
    suotâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstitám
    ovtâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovtâstitám
    povvâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povvâstitám
    čuožâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuožâstitám
    päjittittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittitám
    olgoštittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olgoštitám
    suitteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuitám
    muáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muáitám
    suáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáitám
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáitám
    läittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lááitám
